verb.permissive.che.lexd
PATTERNS

# Regular stemmed verbs
RegularPermissiveVerbStems[-agr,-agr_u] [<v>:] Perm (PermWtnsd | PermPerf | PermPres| PermImp | PermFut | Impf)
NounClassU RegularPermissiveVerbStems[agr_u] [<v>:] Perm (PermWtnsd | PermPerf | PermPres| PermImp | PermFut | Impf)
NounClass RegularPermissiveVerbStems[agr] [<v>:] Perm (PermWtnsd | PermPerf | PermPres| PermImp | PermFut | Impf)


# Irregular stemmed verbs
# Imperative
PermissiveVerbStemsImp[-agr,-agr_u] [<v>:] Perm PermImp
NounClassU PermissiveVerbStemsPres[agr_u] [<v>:] Perm PermImp
NounClass PermissiveVerbStemsPres[agr] [<v>:] Perm PermImp

# Present
PermissiveVerbStemsPres[-agr,-agr_u] [<v>:] Perm PermPres
NounClassU PermissiveVerbStemsPres[agr_u] [<v>:] Perm PermPres
NounClass PermissiveVerbStemsPres[agr] [<v>:] Perm PermPres

# Perfect
PermissiveVerbStemsPerf[-agr,-agr_u] [<v>:] Perm PermPerf
NounClassU PermissiveVerbStemsPerf[agr_u] [<v>:] Perm PermPerf
NounClass PermissiveVerbStemsPerf[agr] [<v>:] Perm PermPerf

# Future
PermissiveVerbStemsPres[-agr,-agr_u] [<v>:] Perm PermFut
NounClassU PermissiveVerbStemsPres[agr_u] [<v>:] Perm PermFut
NounClass PermissiveVerbStemsPres[agr] [<v>:] Perm PermFut

# Witnessed past
PermissiveVerbStemsWitnPast[-agr,-agr_u] [<v>:] Perm PermWtnsd
NounClassU PermissiveVerbStemsWitnPast[agr_u] [<v>:] Perm PermWtnsd
NounClass PermissiveVerbStemsWitnPast[agr] [<v>:] Perm PermWtnsd

# Imperfect = present + /ra/               (Aliroyev 2003, p.30)
PermissiveVerbStemsPres[-agr,-agr_u] [<v>:] Perm Impf
NounClassU PermissiveVerbStemsPres[agr_u] [<v>:] Perm Impf
NounClass PermissiveVerbStemsPres[agr] [<v>:] Perm Impf


LEXICON Perm
<perm>:т

LEXICON PermWtnsd
<wpst>:ира

LEXICON PermPerf
<perf>:ина

LEXICON PermPres
<pres>:у

LEXICON PermImp
<imp>:а

LEXICON PermFut
<fut>:р
